District of Columbia statutes.
38-751.03

Pilot early warning and support system.

(a)

(1)

There is established a pilot early warning and support system (“early warning and support system”) to track how individual students in grades 4 through 9 in 4 feeder school groups are performing on certain indicators of high school and college readiness. The early warning and support system shall identify students who are at risk of leaving school prior to graduation and develop initiatives to support high school and college readiness and increase high school graduation rates. The initiatives may include:

(A)

College and career awareness;

(B)

Parent outreach and engagement;

(C)

Tutoring and mentoring for struggling learners, including the use of technology-based programs;

(D)

Transition programs for middle and high school (particularly grades 5 and 8);

(E)

Individualized learning plans; and

(F)

Data coaches.

(2)

Two feeder school groups shall be comprised of mid-high-performing schools and 2 feeder school groups shall be comprised of low-performing schools.

(b)

The data collected shall include for each student in grades 4 through 9 in a feeder school group:

(1)

The results of all standardized assessments, including the DC-CAS and DC-BAS;

(2)

Measures of behavior and attendance; and

(3)

Performance measures for math and English courses, including, at a minimum, mid-year and end-of-course grades.

(c)

The Mayor shall implement the early warning and support system in 4 feeder school groups and may give priority to schools in which high school and college readiness initiatives developed pursuant to subsection (a)(1) of this section are in place.

(d)

(1)

Schools within each feeder school group are required to collaborate with each other and with the Mayor’s office to ensure alignment of data collection.

(2)

Individual student data collected through the early warning and support system shall be shared with participating feeder school groups and summarized data shall be shared with the public.

(e)

The participating feeder school groups shall have access to additional funding that shall support new and existing initiatives to increase high school and college readiness and to increase high school graduation rates.

(f)

Funding shall be prioritized for low-performing schools.

History

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 103, 59 DCR 3642